dicts/mi_NZ/mi.dic
tāwhana/j
kau/VRTZF
manawa/ild
O/f
a/WUYJG
e/kd
i/WVUZRFTG
o/mbjka
patopato/S
poporetia/FG
hinga/kj
ruru/TFY
aki/JU
tiri/SF
ako/Fb
tiro/S
taura/d
tōhito/U
rongo/jilk
rea/FUV
rei/fk
reo/j
whira/l
whakahaere/e
aronga/lh
kiekie/A
tauranga/F
pirihi/f
pehi/YF
Potukara/"
matua/OFU
hoe/SYF
hou/jk
kōre/mc
ora/OWSYGFT
tunga/Z
whiua/FJ
ore/T
oro/W
oru/l
mohoa/F
whita/J
whitu/OV
mato/j
ngutu/lj
Kapiti/"
titi/md
amo/abdk
mananga/W
mōhiki/S
whawhati/G
ai/ed
ao/GWS
Poutū/"
au/bh
hohe/kU
rokoroko/a
turuma/ZF
kūiti/e
raurape/O
hera/f
here/FTSU
kāngia/F
anu/d
kerepō/G
kōti/f
keo/YF
keu/F
pōkai/je
matara/b
matapo/c
peka/FV
peke/iadk
Tiriti/"
tōua/d
kōkuhu/ek
ukiuki/V
kihi/TG
kōhua/Y
kurua/R
whakataetae/S
pūrau/i
kūrae/G
apa/FS
apo/SU
tukipū/e
hoki/GFY
hoko/jhk
hakohako/M
toroa/RF
Puke/"
ngāue/J
Ngāti/"
whakawhiwhi/S
tūtataki/J
ōrau/e
kitea/FG
ea/RZF
eo/GTF
hūmārie/e
Hūmārie/"
Māhia/"
ahiahi/e
ara/aFk
totohei/U
ari/FMYU
parenga/c
aro/klijahdge
hīkaka/e
terotero/R
kaokao/F
hua/SGFW
hue/T
pākau/j
rākau/l
poroporo/Y
hui/kdij
Hōrana/"
kia/RT
whetū/FW
wherū/FU
hewa/FSJ
ārahi/e
rongoā/F
teke/J
kāhui/kd
Rāhui/"
kāhua/Z
hono/kj
Kākoa/"
ate/FY
pānga/ik
rewaina/F
ho/GY
kahakaha/Z
kimi/a
aua/Y
aue/e
hautō/j
tuarā/F
ia/RZU
Initonīhia/"
io/TF
Kāmaka/"
hopu/jbk
kina/TRV
kino/SF
whawhe/J
kāraerae/W
rou/Y
kōwha/k
kaukau/F
haki/f
whakakuru/h
tauwhā/l
mātau/Fb
tātau/b
nau/RFZ
pātai/FS
tātai/eb
awa/Fj
kāhu/FZ
kaheru/G
ka/GRZJSV
ki/GRTZJV
ko/T
ku/GTSY
wātea/e
hora/FTS
hore/FS
hori/GF
Pūwatawata/"
mikiki/F
kanakana/R
ariki/SFY
pātia/FU
Pākehā/"
korowha/m
paneke/S
paea/F
tāwai/k
mauritia/O
koi/iak
kou/mk
hauraro/e
Hau/"l
hīanga/J
tīanga/Z
pēhi/FY
hana/FO
ma/hijbdak
me/i
mo/jdc
mu/kj
paihere/e
tāwhi/U
māwhe/d
kiri/SUV
tāwha/ik
tohe/SFU
tohu/FYU
āki/U
raharaha/G
Romeinia/"
tero/R
na/RTZOMY
no/Z
kaihau/V
whakamātau/S
waitohu/k
poupou/ehd
uhu/kd
hape/Y
hapu/j
tongatonga/R
toretore/F
pono/Fk
rua/LOWFJYSGUMVR
rue/T
tioata/R
tāmi/je
tete/VYTF
pa/UVF
pe/ja
pi/ia
po/UGS
ātaahua/F
toke/id
toko/SWUO
whakaata/ka
whakaatu/b
nga/WOJSYUMRTZ
nge/FT
ngu/k
tāne/UFE
haro/l
tauākī/F
mura/h
muru/hk
popo/eh
poutūmārō/e
korohuhū/Y
uki/V
whetuki/S
paka/V
pake/d
paki/FGU
pako/kF
ra/UkZV
re/cfkm
ro/kT
ru/UTZF
haere/FGS
hatete/J
Whenua/"
tomo/FW
kehu/W
kaiwhiria/J
taha/jdhlk
tahi/FRGVTSM
mutu/RFU
pora/k
pori/a
poro/JUFV
aurara/e
mokeke/F
umu/FWV
inawake/l
whakaaio/S
ngaio/YF
ta/UGTZWSVF
te/UTF
tangata/USVFG
to/jkma
tu/klmgjeba
ngahu/TF
Hotahota/"
ngana/T
oroko/a
unu/FSR
tohetohe/UF
ngare/T
pāre/m
ngara/T
kāri/Z
tāri/k
āro/lk
hāro/Y
pana/kjh
ua/TY
ue/T
pango/FJ
hanga/hkejia
Mohapiki/"
paitini/e
topa/hj
keke/VTGF
wini/FJ
puaka/k
paoe/S
taka/FUJVS
taki/FSM
tako/lka
taku/hlkdj
hīrau/ik
tīrau/i
poua/W
kakai/SZ
kōpuku/F
hēra/f
ateate/k
papa/VYSF
Kuki/"
wa/jeba
we/hbi
kautaka/a
koekoe/FR
kahui/Z
toru/VFMJUO
wahine/FV
kanga/V
ārangi/d
kene/G
tuaiti/e
ura/MGR
ure/TS
uri/JV
wēti/m
uru/Fak
rarai/Z
para/YSFG
pare/kW
pari/li
paru/bc
tūtaki/be
pūtake/j
roaroa/FR
taonga/S
torotika/k
wiri/FTJ
rāpunga/U
whaka/d
tāwe/c
whaia/G
Mārata/"
amio/kd
whana/ZF
kahiwi/VU
patua/W
whare/SUF
whara/UYF
pata/h
katau/Z
tapa/hjiecalk
tītōhea/k
patu/SWU
toihara/F
manini/i
katea/S
matangi/j
whati/ZU
kohe/K
kohu/idk
katia/W
katoa/ZS
kere/J
keri/YS
kawai/Zk
tamāhine/S
peihana/J
huka/kihj
koia/FV
marie/Y
koio/b
pīrangi/d
tara/FUGVYS
tare/FR
taketake/k
maunga/j
tari/FUT
taro/M
taunga/UWF
Parahi/"
makuru/d
kaiwhiore/e
rarahi/ZG
pawa/Y
niho/l
pipiha/i
wiwi/i
pihipihi/G
nui/OYGVRFEC
wehi/FW
kawekawe/ki
hakihaki/Y
humu/W
koka/SV
koke/i
koko/FV
whakautu/S
tata/FRU
mauri/UO
Kirikiriroa/"
roherohe/ek
matika/F
patiki/l
matapōuri/G
taua/FRUGYS
pupuni/GF
karati/m
tarawa/T
huaota/S
karari/m
marari/m
rarapa/X
whāiti/eF
Taiwana/"
waruwaru/a
huarere/G
kaha/VSRF
kahi/GZ
weka/O
ārai/SUF
kona/k
tawa/FJ
tinga/RZ
ngawhere/F
kohuki/FG
koropeke/S
tūmata/li
puanga/U
awhe/dki
uriuri/V
puia/W
inaoake/l
Ngāika/"
tae/hmk
tai/kfjmbd
tao/ka
tau/dhema
atua/FS
pupuru/Y
hura/GF
huri/kaj
huru/klj
whai/GYRZ
manoko/a
whao/SZ
whau/AZ
whakatiri/S
kaka/VYSJUF
kaki/U
puka/hl
puke/FVS
Tōpako/"
puku/UFVGSR
whakahora/k
riki/GRZ
whakarau/ei
taipūwhenua/e
kiokio/d
titia/J
kore/FS
tuhi/YSGU
kaeaea/Z
kamo/YSZ
kamu/k
tonotono/S
wānanga/e
tuia/R
kākahu/F
rima/VUO
tea/JMFGV
kana/VRG
kani/m
kano/R
pune/kj
araro/Y
rino/FJ
kumekumea/U
Arawa/"
weri/TF
wero/a
kōura/d
whakawhā/l
tuku/VSU
hārau/ik
mārau/i
takaha/k
takahi/V
kakahi/Y
māori/Fe
kapa/Zj
kape/kj
kapu/bdk
pihapiha/i
utiuti/k
uruuru/F
weti/m
tio/JF
tokona/U
whewhe/T
mārena/e
kara/gk
kari/YU
karo/SZ
tārua/ej
tārehu/d
kakata/Z
pura/G
tāpuke/ge
pure/mkd
whio/id
whiu/FkJ
riri/FTS
riro/ak
whirowhiro/U
kakape/Z
āhua/eadb
tāupe/a
nehu/FVY
herehere/k
retireti/S
kuao/U
raurau/i
kato/XZ
waha/jl
tupu/kbd
kokoti/k
kokoru/e
kaui/Z
waia/FG
Ekuatoa/"
wae/OS
wai/adgc
whānga/J
kōhure/S
tura/GZ
ture/TF
tatauria/F
neke/FUZO
kawa/eY
Marāwi/"
toa/kl
kānataraki/S
toi/j
rehe/G
rehu/YTSFG
pūru/k
ngongo/RF
waiwai/GYF
tutu/ak
whinga/T
maranga/W
pae/hjbdl
pai/Fkj
eweewe/i
tāwhitia/U
tewha/G
Tihi/i
kurakura/Y
haina/fe
wani/k
raurarahi/Z
kōpere/S
reke/FU
reko/FO
umere/e
ruarua/RG
kairangi/Q
uruhi/SF
takahui/d
mākete/S
kirikiri/SVG
ingoa/FO
ngutungutu/h
okoi/R
whakareia/k
whakātu/b
Oreore/"
poroaki/J
taitaka/J
pounamu/YXW
pīnaki/e
pūraho/j
parea/W
uwhi/ZF
tui/kR
whakaora/S
hōu/U
whakou/Z
tākeke/k
kuku/ZV
wari/TF
waro/YT
waru/VO
puhau/W
hiamo/F
Mana/"
tangi/ak
tukunga/FU
Heretaunga/"
tāpapa/K
hāparu/e
orua/Z
ahunga/j
karai/m
haumi/k
whakaputa/b
karei/Z
mua/SUF
parawai/g
tuare/k
pia/P
tītaha/FJ
roha/F
whīwhiwhi/J
kauae/j
takakau/b
rera/FO
rere/MSJFG
punga/T
whena/UF
whenumi/e
ihe/k
iho/ekljd
papaki/b
Maru/"
whero/YGV
pokopoko/j
pūrongorongo/S
pōauau/F
reta/R
whārua/RG
pūhau/k
tohea/U
kotikoti/SY
Tai/"l
kauta/Z
Marino/"
tūhea/e
whakakīkī/S
kōwhao/W
kura/dkl
kuru/FTRS
popoki/U
kapata/Z
nōnaoake/l
ika/YZF
nake/Z
naki/VU
poroa/JF
pūkei/k
Porou/"
ringa/hi
Ao/"d
wawae/ke
turuawaenga/l
rewa/kFd
kapakapa/R
raha/M
pou/WF
raho/S
tokowhā/M
kaitahi/h
mita/i
rona/RZF
Aotea/"
rerewa/U
tairanga/b
ngahau/TF
imu/d
namu/YS
ngangahau/e
whiria/S
takaroa/J
rukuruku/G
aroākapa/k
nano/F
tutuki/JF
ritea/UF
pārore/e
raki/UVYR
tūi/W
titiri/Z
tiora/S
kauhanga/l
ipu/id
kaiwhiri/J
tiria/FP
karaerae/ZW
koura/Y
rori/Y
ē/h
hē/fk
kōpē/Fe
ngē/F
pē/ja
rē/f
tē/h
wē/h
manatā/j
ā/Ukd
hā/kfijd
kā/kflidh
kakā/FZG
kākā/SY
Kūpā/"
mā/kaijeh
matā/m
mātā/h
ngā/h
pā/kflijeh
pūhā/O
rā/VUFM
tā/klmcijgebh
tāpā/c
tūā/d
wā/a
wetā/S
whā/VUGFJTOR
hī/ibdk
kakī/JZ
kī/ekm
kikī/FG
mōtī/F
pahī/U
patī/k
pī/ibd
tī/eij
tītī/JU
wī/T
hō/kj
kō/lmagijb
nō/a
ō/idjka
pō/kfd
rō/R
tō/kljhb
hū/ikd
kōpū/jih
kū/jl
pahū/ek
pū/ijahkelmdb
tū/jhkeldb
ū/OFSYR
takawaenga/S
omoomo/RF
Tia/f"
raparapa/F
ira/YUGF
iro/RF
pua/OFU
tākiri/d
paparite/k
ākiri/S
tomotia/W
Pākihi/"
tākihi/G
Pakitāne/"
mokemoke/e
rapa/UJFG
natu/SZ
pīho/k
harore/FJ
hekenga/UF
takina/FM
Tūwaru/"
puhake/OF
kōkōmuka/Y
iere/Z
hika/S
ioio/RF
hiku/kd
taipū/F
ngahoro/e
renga/c
Pōngia/"
iwa/OV
iwi/SUJV
whaotia/Z
pakira/k
whanga/UY
Pae/"k
māturu/e
hinu/UO
raua/ZF
whakawaiwai/S
teitei/F
Urukoi/"
ngai/kR
ngao/TSF
ngau/TVF
eka/O
eke/UFVTS
rekareka/U
tapepe/e
whakairo/el
piha/i
puhanga/j
rawa/a
whiwhiu/G
moko/hl
emi/F
Kiwa/"
hau/SJVRGTFW
ahua/eF
wewehi/E
whakangaio/S
takataka/FY
nuke/U
waenga/SG
tīkei/E
piki/kejd
hīra/m
tauare/F
whakahē/S
korekore/FR
maha/OU
mahu/dk
hita/J
moni/m
whakarāpopoto/e
hīnau/Y
tihi/FGE
takoto/bF
uruwhenua/FW
whakapā/lk
whakapī/k
Paoa/"
hea/O
tōhi/F
iroiro/FR
Māhaki/"
konihi/S
kuikui/FG
tohutia/Y
pekenga/U
ere/TS
pine/j
Tunihia/"
takitū/M
maka/VU
maki/l
mahau/d
mako/m
whakaruru/e
rangi/lhdj
ranga/bV
tika/FkU
tiko/j
patapatai/S
mahaki/U
ingoingo/F
taina/Z
Rangitihi/"
ngārara/J
mori/FY
eti/T
makau/i
kahikātoa/G
oko/h
pūrangi/d
kōranga/b
kārangi/d
nakonako/RF
Tūranga/l
hia/OW
mana/kFfe
moumou/b
manu/FYSU
oriori/F
tītiti/J
manga/OS
mangu/Y
tāpiri/ke
heke/jdkei
Etiopia/"
tini/MVGU
omo/R
Kohi/"
rau/ZOFXYSUGMR
whakapaepae/S
moua/l
ewa/Fd
hutihuti/U
ngohi/Z
ahi/kl
aho/FMUG
ahu/FW
manako/a
pōhēhē/e
ōna/R
one/PV
ono/OSVG
Tara/"
taroa/Z
piti/J
tipu/kb
ngote/FR
whakakaupapa/e
tātaka/FJ
